Colorado, session 2026A, SB067.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
Shading denotes HOUSE amendment. Double underlining denotes SENATE amendment.
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material to be added to existing law.
Dashes through the words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law.

SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add 23-7.4-303 as
follows:
23-7.4-303. Tuition assistance program for dependents and
spouses of qualified veterans - created - administration - funding -
rules - definitions.
(1) AS USED IN THIS SECTION, UNLESS THE CONTEXT OTHERWISE
REQUIRES:
(a) "COLORADO APPLICATION FOR STATE FINANCIAL AID" HAS THE
MEANING SET FORTH IN SECTION 22-2-127 (1)(a).
(b) "COMMISSION" MEANS THE COLORADO COMMISSION ON HIGHER
EDUCATION CREATED IN SECTION 23-1-102.
(c) "DEPENDENT" MEANS:
(I) A SPOUSE, SURVIVING SPOUSE, PARTNER IN A CIVIL UNION, OR
SURVIVING PARTNER IN A CIVIL UNION; OR
(II) A CHILD, INCLUDING ADOPTED CHILDREN, STEPCHILDREN, AND
FOSTER CHILDREN, OR A CHILD WHO WAS CLAIMED AS A DEPENDENT BY A
QUALIFIED VETERAN ON THEIR TAX RETURN, UNDER TWENTY-SIX YEARS
OLD.
(d) "FREE APPLICATION FOR FEDERAL STUDENT AID" HAS THE
MEANING SET FORTH IN SECTION 22-2-127 (1)(c).
(e) "QUALIFIED VETERAN" MEANS A VETERAN, AS DEFINED IN
SECTION 28-5-100.3, WHO:
(I) WAS KILLED IN ACTION;
(II) DIED IN ACTIVE SERVICE FROM OTHER CAUSES;
(III) IS MISSING IN ACTION;
(IV) IS A PRISONER OF WAR;
(V) DIED AS A RESULT OF A SERVICE-CONNECTED DISABILITY
-2- SB26-067

INCURRED DURING A WARTIME PERIOD;
(VI) WAS, PRIOR TO DEATH, RATED ONE-HUNDRED-PERCENT
PERMANENTLY SERVICE-CONNECTED DISABLED BY THE UNITED STATES
DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS BY EVALUATION OF THE RATING
SCHEDULE; OR
(VII) HAS BEEN DETERMINED BY THE UNITED STATES DEPARTMENT
OF VETERANS AFFAIRS TO BE UNEMPLOYABLE AS A RESULT OF A
SERVICE-CONNECTED DISABILITY.
(f) "STATE COLLEGE OR UNIVERSITY" HAS THE MEANING SET FORTH
IN SECTION 23-2-102.
(2) ON OR BEFORE JULY 1, 2026, THE COMMISSION SHALL
IMPLEMENT A POLICY WHEREBY, EXCEPT AS LIMITED IN THIS SECTION, EACH
STATE COLLEGE OR UNIVERSITY SHALL WAIVE ALL TUITION COSTS,
INCLUDING ANY MANDATORY FEES, DUES, OR OTHER REQUIRED CHARGES,
ASSOCIATED WITH ATTENDANCE AT THE INSTITUTION FOR A DEPENDENT OF
A QUALIFIED VETERAN UPON RECEIPT OF A CERTIFICATE OF WAIVER
ELIGIBILITY DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (5) OF THIS SECTION.
(3) IN ORDER TO QUALIFY FOR THE TUITION WAIVER, A DEPENDENT
OF A QUALIFIED VETERAN MUST:
(a) BE ACCEPTED BY A STATE COLLEGE OR UNIVERSITY;
(b) COMPLETE THE COLORADO APPLICATION FOR STATE FINANCIAL
AID OR THE FREE APPLICATION FOR FEDERAL STUDENT AID; AND
(c) REMAIN IN SATISFACTORY ACADEMIC STANDING IN
ACCORDANCE WITH THE ACADEMIC POLICIES OF THE STATE COLLEGE OR
UNIVERSITY.
(4) THE TUITION WAIVER MUST NOT EXTEND BEYOND SIX YEARS OF
THE DATE OF ENROLLMENT.
-3- SB26-067

(5) THE DEPARTMENT OF MILITARY AND VETERANS AFFAIRS SHALL
ADOPT RULES TO CERTIFY ELIGIBILITY AT THE REQUEST OF A DEPENDENT
OF A QUALIFIED VETERAN AND PRODUCE TO THE DEPENDENT OF A
QUALIFIED VETERAN A CERTIFICATE OF WAIVER ELIGIBILITY. THE
DEPENDENT OF A QUALIFIED VETERAN SHALL SUBMIT THE CERTIFICATE OF
WAIVER ELIGIBILITY TO THE STATE COLLEGE OR UNIVERSITY AT WHICH THE
DEPENDANT IS ENROLLED.
SECTION 2. Safety clause. The general assembly finds,
determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for
the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
-4- SB26-067